District of Columbia statutes.
32-1409

Apprenticeship agreements — Registration and approval; extension into majority of apprentice.

No apprenticeship agreement shall be registered or approved by the Associate Director of Apprenticeship under the provisions of this subchapter unless it conforms with the standards established by or in accordance with this subchapter and is in the best interests of the apprentice. Where a minor enters into an agreement for a period of training extending into his majority, and such agreement has been approved by the Associate Director of Apprenticeship, then such apprenticeship agreement shall, if the parties therein so provide, have the same force and effect during the period covered by the majority of such minor as if such agreement were entered into during the majority of such minor.

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 206, ch. 267, § 9
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(i), 62 DCR 10905

History

This section is referenced in § 32-1408.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 36-411.
1973 Ed., § 36-129.

Prior Codifications

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Associate Director of Apprenticeship” for “Director” twice.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(i) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(i) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(i) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2012(i) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation